District of Columbia statutes.
47-104

Unlawful diversion of tax money.

It shall not be lawful for the District authorities, or any person charged with the disbursements of money in the District, to divert from its legitimate object any money levied or collected as taxes from the people of the District. Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor in office, and be dismissed therefrom.

R.S., D.C., §§ 116, 118
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-104.
1973 Ed., § 47-104.

Prior Codifications